Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.060

Certification requirements—Trainee.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2025, the secretary shall issue a certificate to practice as a certified peer specialist trainee to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that:

(a) The applicant meets the requirements of RCW 18.420.050 (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (4) and is working toward the supervised experience requirements to become a certified peer specialist under this chapter; or

(b) The applicant is enrolled in an apprenticeship program registered and approved under chapter 49.04 RCW and approved by the secretary under RCW 18.420.020.

(2) An applicant seeking to become a certified peer specialist trainee under this section shall submit to the secretary for approval an attestation, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, that the certified peer specialist trainee is actively pursuing the supervised experience requirements of *RCW 18.420.050(1)(d). This attestation must be updated with the trainee's annual renewal.

(3) A certified peer specialist trainee certified under this section may practice only under the supervision of an approved supervisor. Supervision may be provided through distance supervision. Supervision may be provided by an approved supervisor who is employed by the same employer that employs the certified peer specialist trainee or by an arrangement made with a third-party approved supervisor to provide supervision, or a combination of both types of approved supervisors.

(4) A certified peer specialist trainee certificate is valid for one year and may only be renewed four times.

[ 2023 c 469 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 18.420.050(1)(d) appears to be erroneous. RCW 18.420.050(1)(e) was apparently intended.